Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2604.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 31-1-3 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-1 entitled "Definitions and
General Code Provisions" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-1-3. Types of vehicles.
(a)(1) “Antique motor car” means any motor vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25)
years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle may be
maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public
interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously
mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods
over any public highway.
(2) After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may
be issued to it on payment of the standard fee. The vehicle may be operated on the highways of this
and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation “antique” and
display an “antique plate.”
(3) For any vehicle that is more than twenty-five (25) years old, the division of motor
vehicles may also issue or approve, subject to rules and regulations that may be promulgated by
the administrator, a “year of manufacture plate” for the vehicle that is an exact replica plate
designating the exact year of manufacture of the vehicle. The year of manufacture plate, as
authorized by this subsection, need only be attached to the rear of the vehicle.

(b)(1) “Antique motorcycle” means any motorcycle that is more than twenty-five (25)
years old. Unless fully inspected and meeting inspection requirements, the vehicle shall be
maintained solely for use in exhibitions, club activities, parades, and other functions of public
interest. The vehicle may also be used for limited enjoyment and purposes other than the previously
mentioned activities, but may not be used primarily for the transportation of passengers or goods
over any public highway; and
(2) After the vehicle has met the requirements of state inspection, a registration plate may
be issued to it, on payment of the standard fee, and the vehicle may be operated on the highways
of this and other states, and may, in addition to the registration plate, retain the designation
“antique” and display an “antique plate.”
(c) “Authorized emergency vehicle” means vehicles of the fire department (fire patrol);
police vehicles; vehicles of the department of corrections while in the performance of official
duties; vehicles used by the state bomb squad within the office of state fire marshal; vehicles of
municipal departments or public service corporations designated or authorized by the administrator
as ambulances and emergency vehicles; and privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer
firefighters or privately owned motor vehicles of volunteer ambulance drivers or attendants, as
authorized by the department chief or commander and permitted by the Rhode Island Association
of Fire Chiefs and Rhode Island Association of Police Chiefs Joint Committee for Volunteer
Warning Light Permits.
(d) “Automobile” means, for registration purposes, every motor vehicle carrying
passengers other than for hire.
(e) “Bicycle” means every vehicle having two (2) tandem wheels, except scooters and
similar devices, propelled exclusively by human power, and upon which a person may ride.
(f) “Camping recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type camping unit, certified by the
manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.2 Standards, designed primarily as temporary living
quarters for recreation that has either its own motor power or is mounted on, or towed by, another
vehicle. The basic units are tent trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, motorized campers, travel trailers, and
pick-up campers.
(g) “Electric motorized bicycle”, also called an “electric bicycle”, as defined in § 31-19.7-
1, means a two-wheel (2) vehicle that may be propelled by human power or electric motor power,
or by both, with an electric motor rated not more than two (2) (S.A.E.) horsepower, that is capable
of a maximum speed of not more than twenty-eight miles per hour (28 m.p.h.), and are permitted
to be operated on state, municipal roads, or highways in this state by a person sixteen (16) years of
age or older pursuant to § 31-19.1-1 and are not required to be registered under chapter 3 of this
LC005109 - Page 2 of 16

title.
(h) “Electric personal assistive mobility device” (“EPAMD”) is a self-balancing, non-
tandem two-wheeled (2) device, designed to transport only one person, with an electric propulsion
system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen miles per hour (15 m.p.h.), and are
permitted to be operated on state, municipal roads, or highways in this state by a person sixteen
(16) years of age or older pursuant to § 31-10.1-1 and are not required to be registered under chapter
3 of this title.
(i) “Fifth-wheel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding four hundred (400)
square feet in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle that contains a towing mechanism
that is mounted above or forward of the tow vehicle’s rear axle and that is eligible to be registered
for highway use.
(j) “Hearse” means every motor vehicle used for transporting human corpses. A hearse
shall be considered an automobile for registration purposes.
(k) “Jitney or bus” means: (1) A “public bus” that includes every motor vehicle, trailer,
semi-trailer, tractor trailer, or tractor trailer combination, used for the transportation of passengers
for hire, and operated wholly or in part upon any street or highway as a means of transportation
similar to that afforded by a street railway company, by indiscriminately receiving or discharging
passengers, or running on a regular route or over any portion of one, or between fixed termini; or
(2) A “private bus” that includes every motor vehicle other than a public bus or passenger van
designed for carrying more than ten (10) passengers and used for the transportation of persons, and
every motor vehicle other than a taxicab designed and used for the transportation of persons for
compensation.
(l) “Kei car” or “Kei truck” means every motor vehicle of the keijidōsha class of imported
vehicles, including, but not limited to, mini-trucks, microvans, and Kei cars imported pursuant to
49 U.S.C. § 30112(b)(9), having four (4) wheels, an engine displacement of six hundred sixty cubic
centimeters (660 cc) or less, an overall length of one hundred thirty inches (130″) or less, an overall
height of seventy-eight inches (78″) or less, and an overall width of sixty inches (60″) or less.
(m) “Low-speed motor vehicle” or “low-speed vehicle” means a motor vehicle defined in
49 C.F.R. § 571.3 as a vehicle that is four (4) wheeled, whose speed attainable in one mile is more
than twenty miles per hour (20 m.p.h.) and not more than twenty-five miles per hour (25 m.p.h.)
on a paved level surface, is electric, and whose gross vehicle weight rating is less than three
thousand pounds (3,000 lbs.). All low-speed motor vehicles shall comply with the standards
established in 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended, and pursuant thereto, shall be equipped with
headlamps, front and rear turn signal lamps, tail lamps, stop lamps, an exterior mirror mounted on
LC005109 - Page 3 of 16

the driver’s side of the vehicle and either an exterior mirror mounted on the passenger’s side of the
vehicle or an interior mirror, a parking brake, a windshield that conforms to the federal standards
on glazing materials, a vehicle identification number that conforms to the requirements of 49 C.F.R.
pt. 565 for such numbers, a Type 1 or Type 2 seat belt assembly conforming to 49 C.F.R. § 571.209,
installed at each designated seating position, and reflex reflectors; provided, that one reflector is
red on each side as far to the rear as practicable and one reflector is red on the rear. A low-speed
motor vehicle that meets the requirements of 49 C.F.R. § 571.500, as amended, and is equipped as
herein provided, may be registered in this state, subject to inspection and insurance requirements.
(n) “Motorcycle” means only those motor vehicles having not more than three (3) wheels
in contact with the ground and a saddle on which the driver sits astride, except bicycles with helper
motors as defined in subsection (p) of this section a two (2) or three (3) wheeled self-propelled
vehicle designed for use on public roads and highways and displaces in excess of fifty cubic
centimeters (50 cc) or four and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 hp).
(o) “Motor-driven cycle” means every motorcycle, including every motor scooter, with a
motor of no greater than five (5) horsepower, except bicycles with helper motors as defined in
subsection (p) of this section.
(p) “Motorized bicycles” means two-wheel (2) vehicles that may be propelled by human
power or helper power, or by both, with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths (4.9)
horsepower and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), that are capable of a maximum
speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.).
(q) “Motorized camper”: A camping recreational vehicle, built on, or permanently attached
to, a self-propelled motor vehicle chassis cab or van that is an integral part of the completed vehicle.
(r) "Motorized skateboard" means every vehicle regardless of the number of its wheels in
contact with the ground, that:
(1) Is designed to allow an operator to stand;
(2) Is powered in whole or in part by an electric motor;
(3) Weighs less than one hundred pounds (100 lbs.); and
(4) Has a speed of not more than twenty miles per hour (20 mph) on a paved level surface
when powered solely by the electric motor.
(r)(s) “Motorized tricycles” means tricycles that may be propelled by human power or
helper motor, or by both, with a motor rated no more than 1.5 brake horsepower that is capable of
a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.).
(s)(t) “Motorized wheelchair” means any self-propelled vehicle, designed for, and used by,
a person with a disability that is incapable of speed in excess of eight miles per hour (8 m.p.h.).
LC005109 - Page 4 of 16

(t)(u) “Motor scooter” means a motor-driven cycle with a motor rated not more than four
and nine-tenths (4.9) horsepower and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc) that is capable
of a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.) gasoline powered motor-
driven cycle with a motor rated not more than four and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 hp) and not
greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc) that is capable of a maximum speed of not more than
thirty miles per hour (30 mph) or propelled by an electric motor that has a speed of not more than
thirty miles per hour (30 mph) and is not required to be registered pursuant to § 31-3-2.2.
(u)(v) “Motor vehicle” means every vehicle that is self-propelled or propelled by electric
power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails, except vehicles moved
exclusively by human power, an EPAMD and electric motorized bicycles as defined in subsection
subsections (g) and (h) of this section, and motorized wheelchairs.
(v)(w) “Motor vehicle for hire” means every motor vehicle other than jitneys, public buses,
hearses, and motor vehicles used chiefly in connection with the conduct of funerals, to transport
persons for compensation in any form, or motor vehicles rented for transporting persons either with
or without furnishing an operator.
(w)(x) “Natural gas vehicle” means a vehicle operated by an engine fueled primarily by
natural gas.
(x)(y) “Park trailer”: A camping recreational vehicle that is eligible to be registered for
highway use and meets the following criteria: (1) Built on a single chassis mounted on wheels; and
(2) Certified by the manufacturer as complying with ANSI A119.5.
(y)(z) “Passenger van” means every motor vehicle capable of carrying ten (10) to fourteen
(14) passengers plus an operator and used for personal use or on a not-for-hire basis. Passenger
vans may be used for vanpools, transporting passengers to and from work locations, provided that
the operator receives no remuneration other than free use of the vehicle.
(z)(aa) “Pedal carriage” (also known as “quadricycles”) means a nonmotorized bicycle
with four (4) or more wheels operated by one or more persons for the purpose of, or capable of,
transporting additional passengers in seats or on a platform made a part of or otherwise attached to
the pedal carriage. The term shall not include a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed to
it, nor shall it include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the
transportation of a person with a disability, nor shall it include a tricycle built for a child or an adult
with a seat for only one operator and no passenger.
(aa)(bb) “Pick-up camper”: A camping recreational vehicle consisting of a roof, floor, and
sides designed to be loaded onto and unloaded from the back of a pick-up truck.
(bb)(cc) “Rickshaw” (also known as “pedi cab”) means a nonmotorized bicycle with three
LC005109 - Page 5 of 16

(3) wheels operated by one person for the purpose of, or capable of, transporting additional
passengers in seats or on a platform made a part of, or otherwise attached to, the rickshaw. This
definition shall not include a bicycle built for two (2) where the operators are seated one behind the
other, nor shall it include the operation of a bicycle with trainer or beginner wheels affixed thereto,
nor shall it include a wheelchair or other vehicle with the purpose of operation by or for the
transportation of a person with a disability.
(cc)(dd) “School bus” means every motor vehicle owned by a public or governmental
agency, when operated for the transportation of children to or from school; or privately owned,
when operated for compensation for the transportation of children to or from school.
(dd)(ee) “Suburban vehicle” means every motor vehicle with a convertible or
interchangeable body or with removable seats, usable for both passenger and delivery purposes,
and including motor vehicles commonly known as station or depot wagons or any vehicle into
which access can be gained through the rear by means of a hatch or trunk and where the rear seats
can be folded down to permit the carrying of articles as well as passengers.
(ee)(ff) “Tent trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle that is mounted on wheels and
constructed with collapsible partial side walls that fold for towing by another vehicle and unfold
for use and that is eligible to be registered for highway use.
(ff)(gg) “Trackless trolley coach” means every motor vehicle that is propelled by electric
power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated on rails.
(gg)(hh) “Travel trailer”: A towable recreational vehicle, not exceeding three hundred
twenty square feet (320 sq. ft.) in area, designed to be towed by a motorized vehicle containing a
towing mechanism that is mounted behind the tow vehicle’s bumper and that is eligible to be
registered for highway use.
(hh)(ii) “Vehicle” means every device in, upon, or by which any person or property is or
may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices used exclusively upon stationary rails
or tracks.
SECTION 2. Sections 31-3-2 and 31-3-2.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-3 entitled
"Registration of Vehicles" are hereby amended to read as follows:
31-3-2. Vehicles subject to registration.
Every motor vehicle, trailer, semi-trailer, pole trailer, motorized camper, tent trailer, travel
trailer, pick-up coach, and pick-up camper, owned by a resident of this state when operated or
drawn upon a highway within this state for a period of thirty (30) days, shall be subject to the
registration provisions of chapters 3 — 9 of this title except:
(1) Any vehicle operated upon a highway in conformance with the provisions of the
LC005109 - Page 6 of 16

chapters relating to manufacturers, transporters, dealers, lien holders, or nonresidents;
(2) Any vehicle that is operated upon a highway only for the purpose of crossing the
highway but not along the highway from one property to another;
(3) Any farm vehicle, whether or not of a type otherwise subject to registration under this
chapter, that is only incidentally operated upon a highway. For purposes of this title, the phrase
“incidentally operated upon a highway” shall mean the operation upon a highway of a slow-moving
motor vehicle that is designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing
machines, and other implements of husbandry, between agricultural operations owned or managed
by the owner of the motor vehicle. Unless the incidental operation is only for purposes of crossing
the highway but not traveling along it, the farm vehicle engaged in the incidental operation shall
display a “Slow Moving Vehicle” emblem in a manner that complies with requirements established
by the division of motor vehicles;
(4) Any special mobile equipment as defined in § 31-1-9;
(5) Any vehicle that is propelled exclusively by electric power obtained from overhead
trolley wires, though not operated upon rails;
(6) Any low-speed motor vehicle or low-speed vehicle as defined in § 31-1-3;
(7) Any electric motorized bicycle exempt pursuant to § 31-3-2.2;
(8) An electric personal assistive mobility device ("EPAMD") exempt pursuant to § 31-3-
2.2.
31-3-2.2. Registration of motorcycles, motorized bicycles, and motorized tricycles.
(a) Every motorcycle, motorized bicycle, and motorized tricycle owned by a resident of
this state shall be subject to the registration provisions of chapters 3 — 9 of this title whether the
motorcycle, motorized bicycle, or motorized tricycle is operated or drawn upon a highway within
this state or upon private property. An electric personal assistive mobility device (“EPAMD”) and
electric motorized bicycles shall not be required to register under this chapter; provided, however,
that an EPAMD and/or electric motorized bicycles shall not be operated in this state by a person
under the age of sixteen (16) years pursuant to §§ 31-1-3(g) and 31-1-3(h).
(b) Notwithstanding any general law to the contrary, cities and towns are empowered to
enact ordinances that permit the use and regulation of electric personal assistive mobility devices
(“EPAMD”).
SECTION 3. Section 31-10.1-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-10.1 entitled "Special
Licenses for Motorcycles, Motor Scooters, Low-Speed Vehicles and Other Motor Driven Cycles"
is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-10.1-1. License required.
LC005109 - Page 7 of 16

(a) No resident of this state, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive
any two-wheeled (2) motorcycle or motor-driven cycle upon a highway in this state, unless the
person shall first obtain a special license as an operator under the provisions of this chapter;
provided, however, motorized bicycles and motor scooters with a motor rated not more than four
and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 h.p.) and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), which is
capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.), shall be exempt
from the provisions of this section. No person shall be licensed pursuant to this chapter unless he
or she shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age or unless the person previously has been issued a
full operator’s license or a limited provisional license and has satisfied the requirements of § 31-
10.1-3(a), has the required equipment pursuant to § 31-10.1-4, or is already licensed under a prior
act of this state. Any person under the age of eighteen (18) duly licensed under the prior act shall
be eligible to have his or her license renewed in the same manner as persons over the age of eighteen
(18). All licenses issued pursuant to this chapter shall reflect any requirement of the operator to
wear a helmet pursuant to § 31-10.1-4.
(b) No resident of this state, except those expressly exempted in this chapter, shall drive
any three-wheeled (3) motorcycle or motor-driven cycle upon a highway in this state, unless the
person shall first obtain a special license as an operator under the provisions of this chapter;
provided, however, motorized bicycles and motor scooters with a motor rated not more than four
and nine-tenths horsepower (4.9 h.p.) and not greater than fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc), which is
capable of a maximum speed of not more than thirty miles per hour (30 m.p.h.), shall be exempt
from the provisions of this section. No person shall be licensed pursuant to this chapter unless he
or she shall be at least sixteen (16) years of age or unless the person previously has been issued a
full operator’s license or a limited provisional license and has satisfied the requirements of § 31-
10.1-3(b) or is already licensed under a prior act of this state. Any person under the age of eighteen
(18) years duly licensed under the prior act shall be eligible to have their license renewed in the
same manner as persons over the age of eighteen (18) years. All licenses issued pursuant to this
chapter shall reflect any requirement of the operator to wear a helmet pursuant to § 31-10.1-4.
(c) Any person currently licensed pursuant to this chapter, prior to March 1, 2022, shall
continue to be permitted to operate both two-wheeled (2) and three-wheeled (3) motorcycles and
motor-driven cycles without further examination.
(d) The holder of a special license as an operator under the provisions of this chapter who
has a limited provisional license may drive the motorcycle only at times when the license holder
could drive a motor vehicle without supervision pursuant to § 31-10-6.
SECTION 4. Section 31-19.7-1 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-19.7 entitled "Electric
LC005109 - Page 8 of 16

Bicycles" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-19.7-1. Classes.
(a) There shall be three (3) four (4) classes of electric bicycles:
(1) Class 1: Bicycle equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the
rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the electric bicycle reaches twenty
miles per hour (20 m.p.h.).
(2) Class 2: Bicycle equipped with a throttle-actuated electric motor that ceases to provide
assistance when the electric bicycle reaches twenty miles per hour (20 m.p.h.).
(3) Class 3: Bicycle equipped with an electric motor that provides assistance only when the
rider is pedaling, and that ceases to provide assistance when the electric bicycle reaches twenty-
eight miles per hour (28 m.p.h.).
(4) Class 4: Bicycle equipped with an electric motor exceeding seven hundred fifty watts
(750W) and a top assisted speed over twenty-eight miles per hour (28 mph). Provided, class 4
bicycles shall be also be deemed to be a “recreational vehicle” as defined in chapter 3.2 of title 31
(“snowmobiles and recreational vehicles”) and subject to the same operation, rules, and regulations
pertaining to recreational vehicles provided for in that chapter.
(b) All businesses that sell electric bicycles in Rhode Island shall prominently display
provisions and restrictions of state law regulating electric bicycles.
(c) The Rhode Island office of energy resources shall notify electric bicycle rebate
recipients of applicable state laws regarding electric bicycles.
SECTION 5. Chapter 31-19.7 of the General Laws entitled "Electric Bicycles" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
31-19.7-4. Notice of state laws, rules, and regulations.
(a) All businesses that sell electric bicycles in Rhode Island shall prominently display
provisions and restrictions of state law regulating electric bicycles.
(b) The office of energy resources shall notify electric bicycle rebate recipients of
applicable state laws regarding electric bicycles, including but not limited to the provisions of this
chapter and any regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.
SECTION 6. Section 31-22-30 of the General Laws in Chapter 31-22 entitled
"Miscellaneous Rules" is hereby amended to read as follows:
31-22-30. Distracted driving prohibited while operating a motor vehicle.
(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
(1) “Driving” means operating a motor vehicle on a public road, including operation while
temporarily stationary because of traffic, a traffic light or stop sign, or otherwise, but does not
LC005109 - Page 9 of 16

include operating a motor vehicle when the vehicle has pulled over to the side of, or off, an active
roadway and has stopped in a location where it can safely remain stationary.
(2) “Hands free” means the manner in which a wireless handset is operated by using an
internal feature or function, or through an attachment or addition, including, but not limited to, an
earpiece, headset, remote microphone, or short-range wireless connection, thereby allowing the
user to operate said device without the use of hands, except to activate, deactivate, or initiate a
feature or function thereof.
(3) “Inoperability” means a motor vehicle that is incapable of being operated or being
operated in a safe and prudent manner due to mechanical failure, including, but not limited to,
engine overheating or tire failure.
(4) “Motor vehicle” means any vehicle that is self-propelled by a motor, including, but not
limited to: automobiles, trucks, vans, construction vehicles, etc.; provided, for provisions of this
section only, the term “motor vehicle” also includes electric bicycles, electric motorize bicycles,
electric-powered motor scooters, motorized skateboards, and electric personal assistive mobility
devices as defined §31-1-3.
(5) “Person” means any natural person, corporation, unincorporated association, firm,
partnership, joint venture, joint stock association, or other entity or business organization of any
kind.
(6) “Personal wireless communication device” means a hand-held device through which
personal wireless services (commercial mobile services, unlicensed wireless services, and common
carrier wireless exchange access services) are transmitted, but does not include a global navigation
satellite receiver used for positioning, emergency notification, or navigation purposes.
(7) “Stopped” means not in motion.
(8) “Text message,” also referred to as short messaging service (SMS), means the process
by which users send, read, or receive messages on a wireless handset, including text messages,
instant messages, electronic messages, or e-mails, in order to communicate with any person or
device.
(9) [Deleted by P.L. 2025, ch. 401, § 1 and P.L. 2025, ch. 402, § 1.]
(10) “Wireless handset” means a portable electronic or computing device, including mobile
devices and personal digital assistants (PDAs), capable of transmitting data.
(b) No person shall use a wireless handset or personal wireless communication device to
compose, read, or send text messages, or for any other purpose while driving a motor vehicle on
any public street or public highway within the state of Rhode Island except for:
(1) Any law enforcement, public safety or police officers, emergency services officials,
LC005109 - Page 10 of 16

first aid, emergency medical technicians and personnel, and fire safety officials in the performance
of duties arising out of, and in the course of, their employment as such;
(2) A person using a wireless handset to contact an individual listed in subsection (b)(1);
(3) A person using a wireless handset or personal wireless communication device inside a
motor vehicle while such motor vehicle is parked, standing, or stopped and is removed from the
flow of traffic, in accordance with applicable laws, rules, or ordinances, or is stopped due to the
inoperability of such motor vehicle;
(4) A person activating, viewing, or deactivating a global positioning or navigation device
or a global positioning or navigation application while the handset is mounted or otherwise affixed
to the vehicle to allow for hands-free operation; or
(5) The use of a personal wireless communication device in a hands-free manner, with a
hands-free accessory, or with the activation or deactivation of a feature or function of the personal
wireless communication device with the motion of a single swipe or tap of the finger of the driver.
(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a person driving a motor vehicle
from utilizing a hands-free wireless handset.
The nonemergency use by pilot/escort vehicle drivers of portable electronic devices is
prohibited.
(d) Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction,
be subject to a fine of one hundred dollars ($100); for a second conviction a person shall be subject
to a fine of one hundred fifty dollars ($150); and for a third or subsequent conviction a person shall
be subject to a fine of two hundred fifty dollars ($250). All violations arising out of this section
shall be heard in the Rhode Island traffic tribunal.
(e) If the offending operator elects to dispose of the charge without personally appearing
before the traffic tribunal, then in accordance with the provisions of § 31-41.1-3, the operator shall
execute the form indicated and return it to the traffic tribunal not later than twenty (20) days from
the date of the summons, either by mailing or delivering the form and summons, to the violation
section of the traffic tribunal, or to its designee, together with a check or money order in the amount
indicated by the fine schedule on the form in addition to any technology surcharge applied by the
traffic tribunal assessed in accordance with § 8-15-11.
SECTION 7. Legislative Findings:
The general assembly finds that:
(1) The use of powered wheeled devices such as motorized bicycles, motor scooters,
electric bicycles, and electric personal assistive mobility devices (EPAMDs) is increasing rapidly
and presents unique safety and regulatory challenges.
LC005109 - Page 11 of 16

(2) Current laws regulating these devices are scattered throughout the general laws, causing
confusion among operators, law enforcement, and the public.
(3) Centralizing and clarifying the legal framework governing these devices will improve
safety, compliance, and enforcement while promoting efficient use of public ways.
SECTION 8. Title 31 of the General Laws entitled "MOTOR AND OTHER VEHICLES"
is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 19.8
CONSOLIDATED REGULATION OF POWERED WHEELED DEVICES AND
MICROMOBILITY VEHICLES
31-19.8-1. Motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, and motorized tricycles.
(a) Definitions.
(1) “Motorcycle,” “motor-driven cycle,” and “motorized tricycle” are defined in § 31-1-3.
(b) Registration. Every motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, and motorized tricycle shall be
registered with the division of motor vehicles and display a valid registration plate in accordance
with chapter 3 of title 31, including § 31-3-2.2.
(c) Licensing.
(1) No person shall operate a motorcycle, motor-driven cycle, or motorized tricycle unless
holding a valid driver’s license with a motorcycle endorsement or permit as required by § 31-10.1-
1.
(2) The administrator of the division of motor vehicles may issue restricted or provisional
licenses for motor-driven cycles or motorized tricycles as authorized by chapter 10.1 of title 31.
(d) Equipment.
Motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, and motorized tricycles shall be equipped with:
(1) At least one rearview mirror;
(2) Eye protection approved by the administrator; and
(3) Additional equipment as required by the administrator pursuant to § 31-10.1-4.
(e) Helmet requirements.
(1) Operators under twenty-one (21) years of age shall wear an approved helmet.
(2) Operators of any age must wear an approved helmet during the first twelve (12) months
after receiving their initial motorcycle license or endorsement.
(f) Passenger safety. Passengers must be seated on permanent seats with footrests and wear
helmets approved by the administrator.
(g) Operation and enforcement. Motorcycles, motor-driven cycles, and motorized tricycles
must comply with all applicable traffic laws, with violations subject to penalties under chapter 41.1
LC005109 - Page 12 of 16

of title 31.
31-19.8-2. Motorized bicycles and motor scooters.
(a) Definitions.
(1) “Motorized bicycle” and “motor scooter” are defined in § 31-1-3.
(b) Registration. Motorized bicycles and motor scooters must be registered pursuant to §
31-3-2.2, unless specifically exempted.
(c) Licensing.
(1) No person under sixteen (16) years of age may operate a motorized bicycle.
(2) Operators must hold a valid motor vehicle operator’s license; subject to exemption
pursuant to 31-10.1-1.
(3) Motorized bicycles with engine displacement over fifty cubic centimeters (50 cc) or
maximum speed over thirty miles per hour (30 mph) require a motorcycle endorsement pursuant to
chapter 31-10.1.
(4) Motor scooters are subject to licensing requirements for motorcycles or motor-driven
cycles.
(d) Equipment. Required equipment includes brakes and lights appropriate to the vehicle
type.
(e) Helmet requirements. Operators and passengers under twenty-one (21) years of age
shall wear a helmet approved by the administrator.
(f) Operation and enforcement. Motorized bicycles and motor scooters shall comply with
applicable traffic laws, with violations subject to penalties under chapter 41.1 of title 31.
31-19.8-3. Electric bicycles (E-bikes).
(a) Definitions.
(1) “Electric bicycle” and its classes are defined in § 31-19.7-1.
(b) Registration and licensing. E-bikes, pursuant to §31-3-2.2 are exempt from registration
and do not require a driver’s license. Operators must be at least sixteen (16) years old.
(c) Helmet requirements. Helmet use is required for operators and passengers under
twenty-one (21) years of age pursuant § 31-19.7-3.
(d) Operation and enforcement. E-bikes may be operated where permitted on roads, bike
lanes, and paths, with violations subject to penalties in chapter 41.1 of title 31.
31-19.8-4. Electric personal assistive mobility devices (EPAMDs).
(a) Definitions.
(1) “EPAMD” is defined in § 31-1-3.
(b) Registration and licensing. EPAMDs are exempt from registration, pursuant to § 31-3-
LC005109 - Page 13 of 16

2.2; operators must be at least sixteen (16) years old and do not require a driver’s license.
(c) Equipment and operation. Subject to local regulations and DMV safety rules; EPAMDs
have rights similar to bicycles on sidewalks and shared pathways, pursuant to §§ 31-19-11 and 31-
19-12.
(d) Enforcement. Violations subject to penalties under chapter 41.1 of title 31.
31-19.8-5. Local authority.
Local governments may adopt regulations consistent with this chapter regarding the
operation of powered wheeled devices on sidewalks, bike paths, and other public ways.
31-19.8-6. Powered wheeled device and micromobility vehicle information --
Department of motor vehicles website posting required.
(a) The division of motor vehicles shall maintain and make available to the public, in a
clear and conspicuous location on its official website, a centralized informational page
summarizing the laws and requirements applicable to powered wheeled devices and micromobility
vehicles regulated under title 31.
(b) The informational page required under subsection (a) of this section shall, at a
minimum, include for each applicable class of vehicle:
(1) The statutory definition of the vehicle type;
(2) Registration requirements, if any;
(3) Operator licensing or permit requirements, if any;
(4) Equipment requirements, including lighting and safety equipment;
(5) Helmet and passenger safety requirements, if applicable;
(6) Age restrictions on operation;
(7) General rules of operation; and
(8) Citations to the relevant sections of the general laws governing each requirement.
(c) The informational page shall distinguish among vehicle classes including, but not
limited to:
(1) Motorcycles;
(2) Motor-driven cycles;
(3) Motorized tricycles;
(4) Motorized bicycles;
(5) Motor scooters;
(6) Electric bicycles; and
(7) Electric personal assistive mobility devices (EPAMDs).
(d) The division shall ensure that the information posted pursuant to this section is kept
LC005109 - Page 14 of 16

current and updated in a timely manner following any amendment to the general laws or adoption
of regulations affecting the vehicles listed in subsection (c) of this section.
(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to alter, expand, or limit any substantive
requirement of law. The informational materials provided pursuant to this section are intended
solely to improve public access, understanding, and compliance with existing law.
31-19.8-7. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter is held invalid, the remainder shall remain in full force and
effect.
SECTION 9. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC005109
========
LC005109 - Page 15 of 16